Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3581.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 14, article 9, section 11, is amended to read: Sec. 11. CITY OF WAYZATA; TIF DISTRICT NO. 6; EXPENDITURES ALLOWED. new text begin (a) new text end Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 469.1763, subdivision 2, the city of Wayzata may expend increments generated from Tax Increment Financing District No. 6 for the design and construction of the lakefront pedestrian walkway and community transient lake public access infrastructure related to the Panoway on Wayzata Bay project, and all such expenditures are deemed expended on activities within the district. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 469.1763, subdivision 2, the city of Wayzata may expend increments generated from Tax Increment Financing District No. 6 on the following projects: new text end new text begin (1) design and construction of the Eco Park, including shoreline restoration, marsh and water quality improvements, a pier extension of the lakeside boardwalk, and creation of eco-living classrooms; new text end new text begin (2) restoration of the Section Foreman House, including installation of a learning center and community space; and new text end new text begin (3) expansion and remodeling of the Depot Park, including accessibility improvements related to the Panoway on Wayzata Bay project. new text end new text begin (c) Expenditures on projects in paragraph (b) are deemed expended on activities within the district. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Wayzata and its chief clerical officer comply with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end